Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-106] Exemption. (a) An insurer
shall be exempt from the requirements of this article if:

(1) The insurer's annual direct written and assumed premium,
excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and National
Flood Insurance Program, is less than $500,000,000; and

(2) The insurance group of which the insurer is a member
has an annual direct written and assumed premium, excluding premiums reinsured with
the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and National Flood Insurance Program, less
than $1,000,000,000.

(b) If an insurer qualifies for exemption pursuant
to subsection (a)(1), but the insurance group of which the insurer is a member does
not qualify for exemption pursuant to subsection (a)(2), then the own risk and
solvency assessment summary report required pursuant to section 431:3D-105 shall
include every insurer within the insurance group. This requirement may be satisfied
by the submission of more than one own risk and solvency assessment summary report
for any combination of insurers; provided that any combination of reports includes
every insurer within the insurance group.

(c) If an insurer does not qualify for exemption
pursuant to subsection (a)(1), but the insurance group of which it is a member qualifies
for exemption pursuant to subsection (a)(2), then the only own risk and
solvency assessment summary report required pursuant to section 431:3D-105 shall
be the report applicable to that insurer.

(d) An insurer that does not qualify for exemption
pursuant to subsection (a) may apply to the commissioner for a waiver from the requirements
of this article based upon unique circumstances.

(1) In deciding whether to grant the insurer's request
for waiver, the commissioner may consider:

(A) The type and volume of business written;

(B) The ownership and organizational structure;
and

(C) Any other factor the commissioner considers
relevant to the insurer or insurance group of which the insurer is a member.

(2) If the insurer is part of an insurance group with
insurers domiciled in more than one state, the commissioner shall coordinate with
the lead state commissioner and other domiciliary commissioners in considering whether
to grant the insurer's request for a waiver.

(e) Notwithstanding the exemptions stated in this
section:

(1) The commissioner may require that an insurer maintain
a risk management framework, conduct an own risk and solvency assessment, and file
an own risk and solvency assessment summary report based upon unique circumstances
including but not limited to the type and volume of business written, the ownership
and organizational structure, federal agency requests, and international supervisor
requests.

(2) The commissioner may require that an insurer maintain
a risk management framework, conduct an own risk and solvency assessment, and
file an own risk and solvency assessment summary report if the insurer:

(A) Has risk-based capital for company action
level event as set forth in section 431:3-403;

(B) Meets one or more of the standards of an insurer
deemed to be in hazardous financial condition as defined in section 431:15-103.5;
or

(C) Otherwise exhibits qualities of a troubled
insurer as determined by the commissioner.

(f) If an insurer that qualifies for an exemption
pursuant to subsection (a) subsequently no longer qualifies for that exemption due
to changes in premium, as reflected in the insurer's most recent annual statement
or in the most recent annual statements of the insurers within the insurance group
of which the insurer is a member, the insurer shall have one year following the
year the threshold is exceeded to comply with the requirements of this article.
[L 2016, c 140, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next